Hawaii statutes.
§182-15 Other use of surface of state
lands. Where mining leases are granted on state lands, the board of land
and natural resources may reserve to the State the right to lease, sell, or
otherwise dispose of the surface of the lands embraced within the lease. The
lease, sale, or other disposal of the surface, if made, shall be subject to the
rights of the holder of the mining lease. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp,
§99A-15; HRS §182-15]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next